Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Covered entity” has the meaning given that term in 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(4).
(b) “Manufacturer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 646A.689.
(c) “340B drug” means a drug that has been subject to an offer of  a reduced price by a
manufacturer pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 256b and is purchased by a covered entity.
(d) “Utilization review” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.001.
(2) A manufacturer or third party on behalf of a manufacturer may not:
(a) Deny, restrict, prohibit or otherwise interfere  directly or indirectly with the acquisi-
tion of a 340B drug, delivery of a 340B drug  to or dispensation of a 340B drug by a pharmacy
that has contracted with a covered entity to  receive and dispense 340B drugs on behalf of the
covered entity in this state unless the acquisition  delivery or dispensation is prohibited by
the United States Department of Health and Human Services.
(b) Require, either directly or indirectly, a covered entity to submit a claim or utilization
review data as a condition for  the acquisition of a 340B drug by, delivery of a 340B drug to
or dispensation of a 340B drug by a pharmacy that has contracted with a  covered entity to
receive and dispense  340B drugs on behalf of the covered entity in this state unless the
claims or utilization review data submission is required by the United  States Department of
Health and Human Services.
SECTION 2.
(1) In addition to any other liability or penalty  provided by law, the State
Board of Pharmacy may  impose a civil penalty for any violation of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
A civil penalty imposed under this section may not exceed $5,000 per day on  a manufacturer
for each violation.
(2) All penalties recovered under this section shall be  deposited into the State Board of
Pharmacy Account established in ORS 689.139.
(3) Any civil penalty under this section shall be  imposed in the manner provided in ORS
183.745.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 2385 (HB 2385-B) Page 1
Passed by House April 14, 2025
Repassed by House June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 28, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2385 (HB 2385-B) Page 2